third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/fo_FO/fo_FO.aff
FLAG num
#búffur
SFX 619 N 14
SFX 619 f s .
SFX 619 f sins .
SFX 619 0 a .
SFX 619 0 anna .
SFX 619 0 ar .
SFX 619 0 arnar .
SFX 619 0 arnir .
SFX 619 0 i .
SFX 619 0 in .
SFX 619 0 inum .
SFX 619 0 um .
SFX 619 0 unum .
SFX 619 0 ur .
SFX 619 0 urin .

#heygur
SFX 620 N 14
SFX 620 0 a .
SFX 620 0 anna .
SFX 620 0 ar .
SFX 620 0 arnar .
SFX 620 0 arnir .
SFX 620 0 i .
SFX 620 0 in .
SFX 620 0 num .
SFX 620 0 s .
SFX 620 0 sins .
SFX 620 0 um .
SFX 620 0 unum .
SFX 620 0 ur .
SFX 620 0 urin .

#bókartittul
SFX 621 N 13
SFX 621 t la .
SFX 621 t lanna .
SFX 621 t lar .
SFX 621 t larnar .
SFX 621 t larnir .
SFX 621 t li .
SFX 621 t linum .
SFX 621 t lum .
SFX 621 t lunum .
SFX 621 0 ul .
SFX 621 0 ulin .
SFX 621 0 uls .
SFX 621 0 ulsins .

#Eiði
SFX 622 N 2
SFX 622 0 i .
SFX 622 0 is .

#ásin
SFX 623 N 11
SFX 623 0 in .
SFX 623 0 inið .
SFX 623 0 inini .
SFX 623 0 ins .
SFX 623 0 insins .
SFX 623 0 na .
SFX 623 0 nanna .
SFX 623 0 ni .
SFX 623 0 ninum .
SFX 623 0 num .
SFX 623 0 nunum .

#blúgvur
SFX 624 N 8
SFX 624 v t .
SFX 624 0 a .
SFX 624 0 an .
SFX 624 0 ar .
SFX 624 0 ari .
SFX 624 0 ir .
SFX 624 0 um .
SFX 624 0 ur .

#bryggj
SFX 625 N 4
SFX 625 j i .
SFX 625 j ið .
SFX 625 j inum .
SFX 625 0 num .

#bestilla
SFX 626 N 5
SFX 626 l t .
SFX 626 l ti .
SFX 626 l tu .
SFX 626 0 a .
SFX 626 0 ir .

#átrú
SFX 627 N 11
SFX 627 0 a .
SFX 627 0 anna .
SFX 627 0 ar .
SFX 627 0 arinnar .
SFX 627 0 in .
SFX 627 0 ina .
SFX 627 0 ir .
SFX 627 0 irnar .
SFX 627 0 nni .
SFX 627 0 um .
SFX 627 0 unum .

#brandhvassur
SFX 628 N 7
SFX 628 s t .
SFX 628 0 a .
SFX 628 0 an .
SFX 628 0 ar .
SFX 628 0 ari .
SFX 628 0 ir .
SFX 628 0 ur .

#eyrheyggjur
SFX 629 N 12
SFX 629 j i .
SFX 629 j in .
SFX 629 j inum .
SFX 629 0 a .
SFX 629 0 anna .
SFX 629 0 ar .
SFX 629 0 arnar .
SFX 629 0 arnir .
SFX 629 0 um .
SFX 629 0 unum .
SFX 629 0 ur .
SFX 629 0 urin .

#feigdarfongur
SFX 630 N 4
SFX 630 j i .
SFX 630 j inum .
SFX 630 0 ar .
SFX 630 0 arins .

#andstøða
SFX 631 N 6
SFX 631 0 a .
SFX 631 0 að .
SFX 631 0 aði .
SFX 631 0 aðu .
SFX 631 0 ar .
SFX 631 0 ir .

#hjartasuff
SFX 632 N 10
SFX 632 f s .
SFX 632 f sins .
SFX 632 0 a .
SFX 632 0 anna .
SFX 632 0 i .
SFX 632 0 ið .
SFX 632 0 ini .
SFX 632 0 inum .
SFX 632 0 um .
SFX 632 0 unum .

#javnvág
SFX 633 N 5
SFX 633 0 ar .
SFX 633 0 arinnar .
SFX 633 0 in .
SFX 633 0 na .
SFX 633 0 ni .

#bibbur
SFX 634 N 14
SFX 634 b s .
SFX 634 b sins .
SFX 634 0 a .
SFX 634 0 anna .
SFX 634 0 ar .
SFX 634 0 arnar .
SFX 634 0 arnir .
SFX 634 0 i .
SFX 634 0 in .
SFX 634 0 inum .
SFX 634 0 um .
SFX 634 0 unum .
SFX 634 0 ur .
SFX 634 0 urin .

#aktýggi
SFX 635 N 7
SFX 635 j i .
SFX 635 j ini .
SFX 635 j ir .
SFX 635 0 a .
SFX 635 0 anna .
SFX 635 0 um .
SFX 635 0 unum .

#sátanskur
SFX 636 N 9
SFX 636 0 ansk .
SFX 636 0 anska .
SFX 636 0 anskan .
SFX 636 0 anskar .
SFX 636 0 anskari .
SFX 636 0 anskir .
SFX 636 0 anskt .
SFX 636 0 anskum .
SFX 636 0 anskur .

#einast
SFX 637 N 5
SFX 637 0 ast .
SFX 637 0 ist .
SFX 637 0 st .
SFX 637 0 tist .
SFX 637 0 tust .

#aksaskjótast
SFX 638 N 1
SFX 638 0 ist .

#akur
SFX 639 N 7
SFX 639 0 a .
SFX 639 0 anna .
SFX 639 0 ar .
SFX 639 0 arnar .
SFX 639 0 arnir .
SFX 639 0 i .
SFX 639 0 inum .

#bloggur
SFX 640 N 14
SFX 640 g s .
SFX 640 g sins .
SFX 640 0 a .
SFX 640 0 anna .
SFX 640 0 ar .
SFX 640 0 arnar .
SFX 640 0 arnir .
SFX 640 0 i .
SFX 640 0 in .
SFX 640 0 inum .
SFX 640 0 um .
SFX 640 0 unum .
SFX 640 0 ur .
SFX 640 0 urin .

#horfikjast
SFX 641 N 5
SFX 641 0 ist .
SFX 641 0 jast .
SFX 641 0 st .
SFX 641 0 tist .
SFX 641 0 tust .

#bobb
SFX 642 N 10
SFX 642 b s .
SFX 642 b sins .
SFX 642 0 a .
SFX 642 0 anna .
SFX 642 0 i .
SFX 642 0 ið .
SFX 642 0 ini .
SFX 642 0 inum .
SFX 642 0 um .
SFX 642 0 unum .

#drapp
SFX 643 N 5
SFX 643 p s .
SFX 643 p sins .
SFX 643 0 i .
SFX 643 0 ið .
SFX 643 0 inum .

#balast
SFX 644 N 5
SFX 644 0 ast .
SFX 644 0 dist .
SFX 644 0 dust .
SFX 644 0 ist .
SFX 644 0 st .

#hanareðr
SFX 645 N 8
SFX 645 0 a .
SFX 645 0 anna .
SFX 645 0 i .
SFX 645 0 ið .
SFX 645 0 ini .
SFX 645 0 inum .
SFX 645 0 um .
SFX 645 0 unum .

#brúður
SFX 646 N 11
SFX 646 r ar .
SFX 646 r arinnar .
SFX 646 0 a .
SFX 646 0 anna .
SFX 646 0 ar .
SFX 646 0 arinnar .
SFX 646 0 arnar .
SFX 646 0 ina .
SFX 646 0 ini .
SFX 646 0 um .
SFX 646 0 unum .

#brúka
SFX 647 N 6
SFX 647 t a .
SFX 647 t ar .
SFX 647 t t .
SFX 647 t ti .
SFX 647 t tu .
SFX 647 0 ur .

#fostursystkin
SFX 648 N 6
SFX 648 j in .
SFX 648 j ina .
SFX 648 j inanna .
SFX 648 j ini .
SFX 648 0 um .
SFX 648 0 unum .

#jarðsláa
SFX 649 N 2
SFX 649 0 di .
SFX 649 0 du .

#alnýggjur
SFX 650 N 7
SFX 650 j ir .
SFX 650 0 a .
SFX 650 0 an .
SFX 650 0 ar .
SFX 650 0 ari .
SFX 650 0 um .
SFX 650 0 ur .

#hásummar
SFX 651 N 12
SFX 651 m ri .
SFX 651 m rinum .
SFX 651 m rum .
SFX 651 m runum .
SFX 651 0 ar .
SFX 651 0 arið .
SFX 651 0 ars .
SFX 651 0 arsins .
SFX 651 0 ør .
SFX 651 0 ørini .
SFX 651 0 ur .
SFX 651 0 urini .

#munnskvaldur
SFX 652 N 3
SFX 652 0 i .
SFX 652 0 ið .
SFX 652 0 inum .

#háðlæa
SFX 653 N 5
SFX 653 ð a .
SFX 653 ð ið .
SFX 653 ð r .
SFX 653 0 i .
SFX 653 0 u .

#boyggja
SFX 654 N 5
SFX 654 g di .
SFX 654 g du .
SFX 654 g t .
SFX 654 0 ir .
SFX 654 0 ja .

#dandisfrú
SFX 655 N 15
SFX 655 0 a .
SFX 655 0 anna .
SFX 655 0 ar .
SFX 655 0 arinnar .
SFX 655 0 in .
SFX 655 0 ina .
SFX 655 0 ir .
SFX 655 0 irnar .
SFX 655 0 m .
SFX 655 0 na .
SFX 655 0 ni .
SFX 655 0 nni .
SFX 655 0 num .
SFX 655 0 um .
SFX 655 0 unum .

#aksaskjótast
SFX 656 N 1
SFX 656 0 ust .

#Blankskáli
SFX 657 N 2
SFX 657 0 a .
SFX 657 0 i .

#flæa
SFX 658 N 5
SFX 658 0 a .
SFX 658 0 ddi .
SFX 658 0 ddu .
SFX 658 0 ir .
SFX 658 0 tt .

#illminnast
SFX 659 N 5
SFX 659 n st .
SFX 659 n tist .
SFX 659 n tust .
SFX 659 0 ast .
SFX 659 0 ist .

#heslikjarr
SFX 660 N 5
SFX 660 r s .
SFX 660 r sins .
SFX 660 0 i .
SFX 660 0 ið .
SFX 660 0 inum .

#bagal
SFX 661 N 13
SFX 661 0 al .
SFX 661 0 alin .
SFX 661 0 als .
SFX 661 0 alsins .
SFX 661 0 la .
SFX 661 0 lanna .
SFX 661 0 lar .
SFX 661 0 larnar .
SFX 661 0 larnir .
SFX 661 0 li .
SFX 661 0 linum .
SFX 661 0 lum .
SFX 661 0 lunum .

#klænisperðil
SFX 662 N 7
SFX 662 0 la .
SFX 662 0 lanna .
SFX 662 0 lar .
SFX 662 0 larnar .
SFX 662 0 larnir .
SFX 662 0 lum .
SFX 662 0 lunum .

#árvissur
SFX 663 N 8
SFX 663 s t .
SFX 663 0 a .
SFX 663 0 an .
SFX 663 0 ar .
SFX 663 0 ari .
SFX 663 0 ir .
SFX 663 0 um .
SFX 663 0 ur .

#berja
SFX 664 N 2
SFX 664 0 ja .
SFX 664 0 jir .

#frystitunnil
SFX 665 N 13
SFX 665 n la .
SFX 665 n lanna .
SFX 665 n lar .
SFX 665 n larnar .
SFX 665 n larnir .
SFX 665 n li .
SFX 665 n linum .
SFX 665 n lum .
SFX 665 n lunum .
SFX 665 0 il .
SFX 665 0 ilin .
SFX 665 0 ils .
SFX 665 0 ilsins .

#langaføsta
SFX 666 N 4
SFX 666 0 a .
SFX 666 0 anna .
SFX 666 0 u .
SFX 666 0 unnar .

#avringt
SFX 667 N 2
SFX 667 d t .
SFX 667 0 um .

#hvappur
SFX 668 N 7
SFX 668 p t .
SFX 668 0 a .
SFX 668 0 an .
SFX 668 0 ar .
SFX 668 0 ari .
SFX 668 0 ir .
SFX 668 0 ur .

#jarðfesta
SFX 669 N 5
SFX 669 0 a .
SFX 669 0 i .
SFX 669 0 ir .
SFX 669 0 u .
SFX 669 0 ur .

#alhalgan
SFX 670 N 4
SFX 670 0 an .
SFX 670 0 una .
SFX 670 0 uni .
SFX 670 0 unnar .

#andatrúgv
SFX 671 N 7
SFX 671 0 a .
SFX 671 0 anna .
SFX 671 0 in .
SFX 671 0 ir .
SFX 671 0 irnar .
SFX 671 0 um .
SFX 671 0 unum .

#eldreiggj
SFX 672 N 11
SFX 672 j in .
SFX 672 j ina .
SFX 672 j ini .
SFX 672 j ir .
SFX 672 j irnar .
SFX 672 0 a .
SFX 672 0 anna .
SFX 672 0 ar .
SFX 672 0 arinnar .
SFX 672 0 um .
SFX 672 0 unum .

#hvørviskilja
SFX 673 N 9
SFX 673 t di .
SFX 673 t du .
SFX 673 t ir .
SFX 673 t ja .
SFX 673 t t .
SFX 673 t ti .
SFX 673 t tu .
SFX 673 t ur .
SFX 673 0 ur .

#bangheit
SFX 674 N 6
SFX 674 0 heit .
SFX 674 0 heitar .
SFX 674 0 heitarinnar .
SFX 674 0 heitin .
SFX 674 0 heitina .
SFX 674 0 heitini .

#blaðøksl
SFX 675 N 9
SFX 675 0 a .
SFX 675 0 anna .
SFX 675 0 ar .
SFX 675 0 arinnar .
SFX 675 0 arnar .
SFX 675 0 ir .
SFX 675 0 irnar .
SFX 675 0 um .
SFX 675 0 unum .
