third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/fo_FO/fo_FO.dic
ærlig/1,674
akslaskot/1,638
akslaskut/1,656
alhalg/1,670
álitisfulltrú/627
allahalg/1,670
ástartek/1,623
átrú/627,65
bang/10,674,290,16
blaðaksl/1,675
blómuknubb/4,634
bókaklubb/4,634
bráð/8,17,423,105,265,378,169,674,342,319,322,58,302,289,225,293
brannýggj/650
bryggj/625,3,6
burturavgjørd/667
byggakr/1,639
demm/1,631
drúgv/624
drýladeiggj/625
eftirfylgj/1,635,3
egghvass/1,628
eiturhvass/1,628
eydnudrúgv/624
Eysturrík/1,622
feilt/1,647
feingj/1,630
fiskadeiggj/625
fiskafeingj/1,630
fjal/1,675
fjallabrúðr/1,646
fjøgg/3,6,640,22
fleirgudatrúgv/671
frø/1,658,64
frú/655,3,194
frystitunn/1,665
fubb/642,6
fulltrú/627,4
Garðarík/1,622
giraff/619
glø/1,658
glugg/6,4,640
góðynskj/1,635
goff/763,619,22
gogg/3,3,6,6,640
greivafrú/655,194
grim/644,14
gygg/1,654
hakkubúff/619
hákunardreingj/1,630
halahvass/1,628
hálvlæð/653
hálvsystkj/1,648
hamskot/1,638
hamskut/1,656
happadrúgv/624
hárhvass/1,628
havfrú/655,194
heiðurstek/1,623
herfeingj/1,630
hestreðr/645
heyg/6,134,11,620
heyggj/6,629,22
himpr/645,44,22
hjarr/660
hjartaklapp/643
horfik/1,16,641
húðber/1,664
hugvill/1,626
hulduheyggj/629
hundabrúðr/1,646
hundsbrúðr/1,646
húsfrú/655,194
hústrú/627
hveitiakr/1,639
hyll/1,626
illveðurssumm/1,651
jarðfest/669
jarðkað/1,661
jartek/1,623
kað/1,661
kaffiakr/1,639
kaliff/619
kálvabebb/634
kálvskot/1,638
kálvskut/1,656
kantsler/1,649
kappkýt/1,637
kappsler/1,649
kavaríggj/672
kjaftsler/1,649
kjarr/660,172,104
knapp/6,44,144,58,12,280,140,668,12
knipr/645
knubb/642,6,4,22
knúst/1,647
knyll/191,626
kongurvág/633
kráarheyg/134,620
kráarheyggj/629
krapp/1,26,668
kubb/642,6,22
kugg/640
kvíð/1,19,631,26
læð/653
lættasuff/632
lagnutrúgv/671
laksastíggj/629
Lamb/1,657
lamsler/1,649
leguakr/1,639
leiksystkj/1,648
litbroyt/1,637,11
lívstek/1,623
ljóðlík/1,11,641
loynistíg/134,620
lubb/4,634,22
lungnatuberk/1,662
lýggj/650
lykkjuskot/1,638
lykkjuskut/1,656
máldrúgv/624
mansver/1,664
markskilt/1,673
mátt/1,36,207,79,49,158,621
miðamerik/1,618,636
miðsumm/1,651
millumgjørd/667
mír/1,644
misbrúkt/1,647
misminn/1,659,15
misunn/1,631
mittkubb/642
mjadn/1,675
mjadnaskut/1,656
møb/1,662
mógvheyggj/629
morgunmøtt/1,621
møtt/1,63,621
mugg/640
Múl/1,657
munnkýt/1,637
mylk/1,16,641
nakkakrapp/1,668
Nes/652
neytatuberk/1,662
niðurber/1,664
nipp/1,631
nøg/1,644
Norðskál/1,657
Norðstjørn/1,670
Norðstjørnan/1,670
norðurkore/1,636,618
norðurvend/667
nýbygg/1,11,654
nýggj/6,170,650
ódrúgv/624
óhvass/1,628
óhyggj/1,635,19
ójavnvág/633
omanfleyggj/625
orðareiggj/672
orðaskvaldr/1,652
orðgýt/1,637
orðkýt/1,637
orðskvaldr/1,652
orðtik/1,56,638
ørminn/1,659,15,11
ovfyll/1,626
óviss/19,663
ovnør/1,644
oyraklaff/619
Oyrarbakk/1,657
papp/643,6
pirr/660,3,6,22
pístr/645,6,135
Porker/1,622
Portugal/1,622
puff/632,632,6
raðfest/669,11
rapp/643,6
reðr/645
reiggj/672,528,3,6
rossatýggj/635,613
ruff/632,22
rugakr/1,639
rukkupapp/643
rygg/1,128,397,11,654,36,230,312,165
saltstroy/1,658
samlík/641,14
samsinn/1,659
samsystkj/1,648
samtitt/1,621
sandheyg/620
sandstroy/1,658
sát/1,3,636
serbygg/1,654
sigursviss/19,663
sjófeingj/1,630
sjókað/1,661
Skál/1,657
skilt/1,673
skjarr/660,6,12,469
skrapp/668
slúkt/1,647
slupr/652,6,22
smeik/1,59,641
smír/1,644
smoygg/1,654
snert/669,16,28
snobb/642,6,634,22
sólbrúðr/1,646
sólsumm/1,651
spælisystkj/1,648
spildurnýggj/650
spinn/1,665,23
spískruskøt/1,666
spottlæð/653
sprett/68,669
stingunebb/642,4
støð/18,8,631,15,32,158
støddarskilt/1,673
støðutek/1,623
stórlæð/653
stríggj/650
suðurafrik/1,618,636
suðurkore/1,636,618
suðurvend/667
suff/632,6
summ/1,6,651
svartrubeit/1,666
svartruspill/1,666
svartrutalv/1,666
svímasler/1,649
systkj/1,648
tág/633,19,22
tálgartág/633
telefonkað/1,661
tenn/76,659,583
tertudeiggj/625
tíðarviss/663
tjent/1,647
tjørupapp/643
tómlæð/653
trúgv/671,301,59,9
tuberk/1,662
týggj/635,613,6
umboðsfulltrú/627,4
undirbrotlig/1,674
undirmíg/620
undirsjóvartunn/1,665
undirtitt/1,621
ungfrú/655,194
úrskilt/1,673
útreiggj/672
vágatunn/1,665
varraskvaldr/1,652
vattasumm/1,651
vegaksl/1,675
ver/10,3,411,664,371,132
Viðareið/1,622
villutrúgv/671
viss/19,6,663
yndisbrúðr/1,646
yvirfyll/1,626
yvirvág/633
